Washington statutes.
RCW 2.53.025

Statewide children's legal representation program.

(1) The statewide children's legal representation program is established within the office of civil legal aid. The children's legal representation program shall ensure the provision of standards-based representation informed by best practice models, rigorous data analysis, race and other equity considerations that cause or perpetuate racial and other disparities in the child welfare system, involvement of stakeholders, including youth and young adults impacted by the system.

(2) The statewide children's legal representation program is responsible for implementation of RCW 13.34.212 and 2.53.045 except that it is the court's responsibility to appoint attorneys in dependency proceedings.

[ 2021 c 210 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 210: See note following RCW 13.34.090.